Washington statutes.
RCW 38.04.020

"Officer," "enlisted persons" defined—Convictions and punishments.

Whenever used in this title, the word "officer" shall be understood to designate commissioned and warrant officers, and the words "enlisted persons" shall be understood to designate members of the organized militia of Washington other than commissioned or warrant officers. The convictions and punishments mentioned unless otherwise specifically designated, shall be understood to be respectively convictions and punishments by military courts.

[ 2009 c 549 s 1011; 1989 c 19 s 2; 1943 c 130 s 80; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-80. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 60.]